src/fst/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ateq
4-You Z1ateqZ ;
ABB-Scandia Z1ateqZ ;
ACU Z1ateqZ ; !navn på en personaleorganisation i AirGreenland
Albani Z1ateqZ ;
Alcotini Z1ateqZ ;
Aldi Z1ateqZ ;
Alitalia Z1ateqZ ;
AltaVista Z1ateqZ ;
Ammirati Z1ateqZ ;
Amnesty Z1ateqZ ;
Arctica Z1ateqZ ; !hyppigt brugt i fx skibsnavnesammensætninger
Arla Z1ateqZ ;
Ascona Z1ateqZ ;
Asea Z1ateqZ ;
Asea% Skandia Z1ateqZ ;
Asea-Brown_Boveri Z1ateqZ ;
Asiaq+Sem/inst:Asiaq Z1ateqZ ;
Atuaaniutitaaq@U.Num.Pl@ Z1ateqZ ;
Atuarfik% Tuiisaq	Z1ateqZ ;
Atuarfik% Ukaliusaq+Sem/inst:Atuarfik% Ukaliusaq Z1ateqZ ;
Audi Z1ateqZ ;
Axapta Z1ateqZ ;
Bacardi Z1ateqZ ;
Bevola Z1ateqZ ;
Bilia Z1ateqZ ;
Bilka Z1ateqZ ;
Blika Z1ateqZ ;
Boda Z1ateqZ ;
Botica Z1ateqZ ;
Bounty Z1ateqZ ;
Bugatti Z1ateqZ ;
Bygma Z1ateqZ ;
Cadbury Z1ateqZ ;
Candelia Z1ateqZ ;
Cap% Gemini Z1ateqZ ;
Carletti Z1ateqZ ;
Carli% Gry Z1ateqZ ;
Century Z1ateqZ ;
Cerruti Z1ateqZ ;
Chardonnay Z1ateqZ ;
Cheminova Z1ateqZ ;
Chiquita Z1ateqZ ;
Ciba-Geigy Z1ateqZ ;
Cinema Z1ateqZ ;
Cinemania Z1ateqZ ;
Cloetta Z1ateqZ ;
Coca-Cola Z1ateqZ ;
Company Z1ateqZ ;
Cowi Z1ateqZ ;
DM-Data Z1ateqZ ;
Dagrofa Z1ateqZ ;
Damixa Z1ateqZ ;
DanaData Z1ateqZ ;
Decca Z1ateqZ ;
Disney Z1ateqZ ;
Dr.% Ingrids% Børnehave+Sem/inst:Dr.% Ingrids% Børnehave Z1ateqZ ;
EMI-Medley Z1ateqZ ;
Edeka Z1ateqZ ;
Encarta Z1ateqZ ;
Encyclopedia Z1ateqZ ;
Estrella Z1ateqZ ;
Expedia Z1ateqZ ;
Facebook+Err/Sub:Facebookki	Z1ateqZ ;
Fakta Z1ateqZ ;
Fanta Z1ateqZ ;
Ferrari Z1ateqZ ;
Fona Z1ateqZ ;
Fuji Z1ateqZ ;
Fujitsu Z1ateqZ ;
Gevalia Z1ateqZ ;
Gilday Z1ateqZ ;
Giro% d'Italia Z1ateqZ ;
Godzilla Z1ateqZ ;
Grammy Z1ateqZ ;
Gucci Z1ateqZ ;
Hafnia Z1ateqZ ;
Hilti Z1ateqZ ;
Hitachi Z1ateqZ ;
Honda Z1ateqZ ;
Hugin-Sweda Z1ateqZ ;
Husqvarna Z1ateqZ ;
Ilta Z1ateqZ ;
Ilva Z1ateqZ ;
Intrum% Justitia Z1ateqZ ;
Isuzu Z1ateqZ ;
Java Z1ateqZ ;
Jubii Z1ateqZ ;
Jutlandia Z1ateqZ ;
Katuaq+Sem/inst:Katuaq Z1ateqZ ;
Kavli Z1ateqZ ;
Kemira Z1ateqZ ;
Kirkbi Z1ateqZ ;
Kvickly Z1ateqZ ;
Labofa Z1ateqZ ;
Lada Z1ateqZ ;
Lalandia Z1ateqZ ;
Lamborghini Z1ateqZ ;
Lancia Z1ateqZ ;
Landia Z1ateqZ ;
Luhta Z1ateqZ ;
Machinery Z1ateqZ ;
Magasin Z1ateqZ ;
Malersortinneq Bogtitel ;
Marabou Z1ateqZ ;
Marcia-Bogø Z1ateqZ ;
Martela Z1ateqZ ;
Mazda Z1ateqZ ;
Medinova Z1ateqZ ;
Mercandia Z1ateqZ ;
Metsä-Serla Z1ateqZ ;
Mike+Sem/inst:Mike Z1ateqZ ;
Minolta Z1ateqZ ;
Mitsubishi Z1ateqZ ;
Modulia Z1ateqZ ;
Money Z1ateqZ ;
Motorola Z1ateqZ ;
Mozilla Z1ateqZ ;
Muku+Sem/inst:Muku Z1ateqZ ;
NP/Grey Z1ateqZ ;
Neriusaaq Z1ateqZ ;
Nokia Z1ateqZ ;
Observa Z1ateqZ ;
Olivetti Z1ateqZ ;
Oqaluttuat% Ilumoortut Bogtitel ;
Oqaluttuat% ilumoortut+Orth/Alt:Oqaluttuat% ilumoortut Bogtitel ;
Ovethi Z1ateqZ ;
Pentra Z1ateqZ ;
Pepsi Z1ateqZ ;
Pharmacia Z1ateqZ ;
Plasto-Bambola Z1ateqZ ;
Play% Butik+Err/Sub:playbutikki Z1ateqZ ;
Pravda Z1ateqZ ;
Principia Z1ateqZ ;
Procordia Z1ateqZ ;
Proxy Z1ateqZ ;
Puiaq+Sem/inst:Puiaq Z1ateqZ ;
Qeqertat@U.Num.Pl@:Qeqertaq@U.Num.Pl@ Z2geo_aqSZ ;
Query Z1ateqZ ;
Saatchi Z1ateqZ ;
Sabena Z1ateqZ ;
Scala Z1ateqZ ;
Scandinavia Z1ateqZ ;
Scania Z1ateqZ ;
Scientology Z1ateqZ ;
Scribona Z1ateqZ ;
Selandia Z1ateqZ ;
Septuaginta Z1ateqZ ;
Shu-bi-dua Z1ateqZ ;
Skandia Z1ateqZ ;
Skanska Z1ateqZ ;
Skoda Z1ateqZ ;
Sony Z1ateqZ ;
Soralu+Sem/inst:Soralu Z1ateqZ ;
Steinway Z1ateqZ ;
Stora Z1ateqZ ;
Suzuki Z1ateqZ ;
Tapola Z1ateqZ ;
Telia Z1ateqZ ;
Tetra Z1ateqZ ;
Toyota Z1ateqZ ;
Tryg-Baltica Z1ateqZ ;
Tusaannga+Sem/inst:Tusaannga Z1ateqZ ;
Vectra Z1ateqZ ;
Veri Z1ateqZ ;
Visa Z1ateqZ ;
Vista Z1ateqZ ;
Yamaha Z1ateqZ ;
Zanussi Z1ateqZ ;
giro% d'Italia Z1ateqZ ;
